src/fst/morphology/ext-github_kristiank/data/giellatekno/gt-norm-yamls/N-omwn_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# This gold standard is automatically generated from the Votic dictionary
# at Språkbanken (https://spraakbanken.gu.se/karp/#?mode=votiska)

Tests:
  Noun - omõn :   # should decline like the paradigm 'asOmõn'
    omõn+N+Sg+Nom: omõn
    omõn+N+Pl+Nom: omõnad
    omõn+N+Sg+Gen: omõna
    omõn+N+Pl+Gen: [omõnoi, omõnojõ]
    omõn+N+Sg+Par: [omõna, omõnaa]
    omõn+N+Pl+Par: [omõnoi, omõnoitõ]
    omõn+N+Sg+Ill: [omõnaa, omõnasõ]
    omõn+N+Pl+Ill: omõnoisõ
    omõn+N+Sg+Ine: omõnõz
    omõn+N+Pl+Ine: omõnoiz
    omõn+N+Sg+Ela: omõnõssõ
    omõn+N+Pl+Ela: omõnoissõ
    omõn+N+Sg+All: omõnõllõ
    omõn+N+Pl+All: omõnoillõ
    omõn+N+Sg+Ade: omõnõl
    omõn+N+Pl+Ade: omõnoil
    omõn+N+Sg+Abl: omõnõltõ
    omõn+N+Pl+Abl: omõnoiltõ
    omõn+N+Sg+Tra: omõnõssi
    omõn+N+Pl+Tra: omõnoissi
    omõn+N+Sg+Ter: omõnassaa
    omõn+N+Pl+Ter: omõnoissaa
    omõn+N+Sg+Com: omõnaka
    omõn+N+Pl+Com: omõnoika
